Wisconsin, session 2025, AB537.
do enact as follows:AB537,13Section 1. 6.87 (9) of the statutes is amended to read:AB537,2,246.87 (9) If a municipal clerk receives an absentee ballot with an improperly 5completed certificate or with no certificate, the clerk may shall return the ballot to 6the elector, inside the sealed envelope when an envelope is received, together with a 1new envelope if necessary, whenever time permits the elector to correct the defect 2and return the ballot within the period authorized under sub. (6).AB537,2,33